Hawaii statutes.
§207-6 Bond authorization. The
director of finance may with the approval of the governor, issue from time to
time general obligation bonds pursuant to chapter 39, part I not exceeding
$500,000 for the granting of loans pursuant to the purposes of this part. [L
1961, c 194, §7; am L 1963, c 114, §1; Supp, §98L-7; HRS §207-6]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next